Hawaii statutes.
§431:4-303 Mutual property insurer.
(a) When applying for a certificate of authority a domestic mutual property
insurer must:

(1) Have applications from at least one hundred
persons for insurance covering at least two hundred and fifty nonadjacent properties,
for insurance aggregating not less than $500,000; and

(2) Have collected from each applicant the proper
premium at a rate not less than a rate adopted by a licensed rating
organization for a term of at least one year; and

(3) Have a surplus over all liabilities, as at
completion of issuance of the insurance contracts so applied for, amounting to
not less than $750,000.

(b) The maximum of any single risk proposed to
be assumed by the insurer shall not exceed ten per cent of its surplus. Any
reinsurance taking effect simultaneously with the policy shall be deducted in
determining the amount at risk for purposes of this provision.

(c) In lieu of the applications, premiums, and
surplus, it is required to have a surplus amounting to not less than $1,250,000
over all liabilities. [L 1987, c 347, pt of §2 as superseded by c 348, §5]

Previous
Vol09_Ch0431-0435H
Next